California, session 20252026, SB411.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Stop Child Hunger Act of 2025.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) No child in California should experience hunger, and all children deserve access to nutrition year round.(b) Families across the country are struggling to afford healthy and adequate groceries.(c) California has led the nation in establishing a universal school meals program for all students, ensuring access to healthy, locally grown breakfasts and lunches during the school year, and in implementing the federal Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer for Children (Summer EBT) program, known in California as SUN Bucks, which provided five million children with a supplemental food benefit in summer of 2024.(d) These programs have made life more affordable for families with children, helping to reduce monthly food bills by an average of $150 per week.(e) The United States Congress established the Summer EBT program as the first new federal entitlement in decades, under the Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2023 (Public Law 117-328), as set forth in Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code. In turn, SUN Bucks was launched in summer of 2024.(f) SUN Bucks, based on a pilot program that produced a decade of evidence that it reduced hunger and helped the hungriest children the most, is remarkably effective in reducing summer child hunger.(g) California is urged to build on its leadership in the fight against child hunger by extending these child nutrition programs to prevent hunger among children during school closures of a week or more and during disasters that cause schools to close.(h) The Legislature is urged to direct the SUN Bucks administrating departments, including the State Department of Social Services, as the lead SUN Bucks agency, and the State Department of Education, to annually maximize receipt of as much as $216 million in federally funded food assistance for the 1.8 million children who need to apply, and to protect the private information of participating families by immediately implementing Section 292.13 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations, which requires states to provide a statewide application for the Summer EBT program.(i) The United States Department of Agriculture has established that every $1 in federal food aid creates as much as $1.80 in total gross domestic product (GDP), as benefits support California’s vital food economy and workers. Accordingly, increasing access to federally funded meals and food benefits is not only good for children, but also good for our economy.(j) A statewide web application will support families who have been devastated by the firestorms in the County of Los Angeles and who are already navigating the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) and programs to easily access the food aid to which their children are federally entitled.SEC. 3. Section 49506 of the Education Code is amended to read:49506. (a) (1) The department shall work with the State Department of Social Services to maximize participation in the federal Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer for Children (Summer EBT) program established pursuant to Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code.(2) The department shall share all data determined by the departments to be necessary to adhere to the requirements of paragraph (1) and Section 18901.57 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(b) The department shall follow the federal guidelines and regulations established pursuant to Section 502 of Title IV of Division HH of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2023 to maximize flexibility for local educational agencies, including school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools, to distribute summer meals through noncongregate distributions.(c) (1) Upon an appropriation made by the Legislature for the express purpose of implementing this subdivision, the department, with support from the State Department of Social Services, shall comply with Section 292.13 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations by developing, and providing families with, a statewide application that is made available through a single statewide internet website that enables families to submit federally required information and that adheres to all of the following:(A) Is made available with sufficient time for families to apply for summer of 2028 benefits.(B) Has the ability to, upon completion of the application, be routed to the applicant family’s local educational agency to determine Summer EBT eligibility.(C) Meets the requirements of Section 102 of Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2024.(D) Is limited, with regard to information requested, to minimum requirements under federal law and guidance.(E) Is translated with accessible language into at least all threshold languages that are required for the CalFresh program.(2) Implementation of paragraph (1) shall be in accordance with the funding timeline of any appropriation made pursuant to paragraph (1).(d) The statewide application developed pursuant to subdivision (c) shall not be subject to the Project Approval Lifecycle of the Department of Technology, pursuant to Section 4819.35 of the State Administrative Manual and all other relevant sections.(e) Upon request, a school district, county office of education, or charter school shall make an electronic device available for families to use to access the statewide application developed pursuant to subdivision (c).SEC. 4. Section 49557 of the Education Code is amended to read:49557. (a) (1) If required by federal law and guidance, the governing board of a school district, the county superintendent of schools, and the governing body of a charter school shall make paper applications for free or reduced-price meals available to pupils at all times during each regular schoolday, and may also make an application electronically available online, provided that the online application complies with paragraph (3). If required by federal law and guidance, the application shall contain clear instructions for families that are homeless or are migrants, and shall also contain, in at least 8-point boldface type, each of the following statements:(A) Applications for free and reduced-price meals may be submitted at any time during a schoolday.(B) Children participating in the federal National School Lunch Program will not be overtly identified by the use of special tokens, special tickets, special serving lines, separate entrances, separate dining areas, or by any other means.(2) A school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school shall use all other paper applications that it has for free or reduced-price meals before using the applications pursuant to this subdivision.(3) If the governing board of a school district, a county office of education, the governing body of a charter school, or a school food authority chooses to provide access to an online application for free or reduced-price meals pursuant to paragraph (1), the online application shall comply with all of the following requirements:(A) Include a link to the internet website on which translated applications are posted by the United States Department of Agriculture, with instructions in that language that inform the applicant how to submit the application. The Legislature finds and declares that federal guidelines require school food authorities to accept and process these applications if they are submitted to the school food authority.(B) Require completion of only those questions that are necessary for determining eligibility.(C) Include clear instructions for families that are homeless or are migrants.(D) Comply with the privacy rights and disclosure protections established by the federal Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act (Public Law 113-79) and the federal Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-277).(E) Include links to all of the following:(i) The online application to CalFresh.(ii) The online single state application for health care.(iii) The internet website maintained by the State Department of Public Health entitled “About WIC and How to Apply,” or another internet website identified by the State Department of Public Health that connects families to the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC Program).(iv) The internet website of a summer lunch program authorized to participate within the city or school district.(v) The internet website providing information about the federal Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer for Children (Summer EBT) program established pursuant to Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code.(F) No online application for free or reduced-price meals shall be made available online or made accessible online by a school district, a county office of education, a charter school, or a school food authority if the online application allows for the information provided by an applicant to be used by a private entity for any purpose not related to the administration of a school food program, or if the online application requires an applicant to waive any right or to create a user account in order to submit the application.(b) The governing board of each school district, each county superintendent of schools, and the governing body of each charter school shall formulate a plan for schools that do not serve meals universally to all children, which shall be mailed to the department for its approval, that will ensure that children eligible to receive free or reduced-price meals and milk shall not be treated differently from other children. These plans shall ensure each of the following:(1) Unless otherwise specified, the names of the children shall not be published, posted, or announced in any manner, or used for any purpose other than the federal National School Lunch Program.(2) There shall be no overt identification of any of the children by the use of special tokens or tickets or by any other means.(3) The children shall not be required to work for their meals or milk.(4) The children shall not be required to use a separate dining area, go through a separate serving line, enter the dining area through a separate entrance, or consume their meals or milk at a different time.SEC. 5. Section 18901.57 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18901.57. (a) The department, as the lead agency in partnership with the State Department of Education, shall maximize participation in the federal Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer for Children (Summer EBT) program established pursuant to Section 1762 of Title 42 of the United States Code.(b) The department shall support the State Department of Education in implementing the requirements described in subdivision (c) of Section 49506 of the Education Code with regard to developing, and providing families with, a statewide application that is made available through a single statewide internet website for purposes of the Summer EBT program.SEC. 6. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.